fr: Compatibilité des vitesses de la transmission: 10 vitesses; 11 vitesses; 12 vitesses; 13 vitesses; 14 vitesses; 2 vitesses; 3 vitesses; 4 vitesses; 5 vitesses; 6 vitesses; 7 vitesses; 8 vitesses; 9 vitesses; Monovitesse; Autre
sk-SK: Kompatibilita rýchlostí pohonu: 10-rýchlostné; 11-rýchlostné; 12-rýchlostné; 13-rýchlostné; 14-rýchlostné; 2-rýchlostné; 3-rýchlostné; 4-rýchlostné; 5-rýchlostné; 6-rýchlostné; 7-rýchlostné; 8-rýchlostné; 9-rýchlostné; Jednorýchlostné; Iné
tr: Aktarma sistemi hız uyumluluğu: 10 vitesli; 11 vitesli; 12 vitesli; 13 vitesli; 14 vitesli; 2 vitesli; 3 vitesli; 4 vitesli; 5 vitesli; 6 vitesli; 7 vitesli; 8 vitesli; 9 vitesli; Tek vitesli; Diğer
lt-LT: Pavaros sistemos greičių suderinamumas: 10 pavarų; 11 pavarų; 12 pavarų; 13 pavarų; 14 pavarų; 2 pavarų; 3 pavarų; 4 pavarų; 5 pavarų; 6 pavarų; 7 pavarų; 8 pavarų; 9 pavarų; Viena pavara; Kita
fi: Voimansiirron nopeusyhteensopivuus: 10-vaihteinen; 11-vaihteinen; 12-vaihteinen; 13-vaihteinen; 14-vaihteinen; 2-vaihteinen; 3-vaihteinen; 4-vaihteinen; 5-vaihteinen; 6-vaihteinen; 7-vaihteinen; 8-vaihteinen; 9-vaihteinen; Yksivaihteinen; Muu
el: Συμβατότητα ταχύτητας συστήματος μετάδοσης κίνησης: 10 ταχυτήτων; 11 ταχυτήτων; 12 ταχυτήτων; 13 ταχυτήτων; 14 ταχυτήτων; 2 ταχυτήτων; 3 ταχυτήτων; 4 ταχυτήτων; 5 ταχυτήτων; 6 ταχυτήτων; 7 ταχυτήτων; 8 ταχυτήτων; 9 ταχυτήτων; Μία ταχύτητα; Άλλο
pt-BR: Compatibilidade de velocidade da transmissão: 10 velocidades; 11 velocidades; 12 velocidades; 13 velocidades; 14 velocidades; 2 velocidades; 3 velocidades; 4 velocidades; 5 velocidades; 6 velocidades; 7 velocidades; 8 velocidades; 9 velocidades; Marcha única; Outros
pl: Kompatybilność liczby przełożeń napędu: 10-rzędowy; 11-rzędowy; 12-rzędowy; 13-rzędowy; 14-rzędowy; 2-rzędowy; 3-rzędowy; 4-rzędowy; 5-rzędowy; 6-rzędowy; 7-rzędowy; 8-rzędowy; 9-rzędowy; Jednobiegowy; Inne
de: Geschwindigkeitskompatibilität des Antriebsstrangs: 10-fach; 11-fach; 12-fach; 13-fach; 14-fach; 2-fach; 3-fach; 4-fach; 5-fach; 6-fach; 7-fach; 8-fach; 9-fach; Singlespeed; Sonstige
pt-PT: compatibilidade da velocidade da transmissão: 10 velocidades; 11 velocidades; 12 velocidades; 13 velocidades; 14 velocidades; 2 velocidades; 3 velocidades; 4 velocidades; 5 velocidades; 6 velocidades; 7 velocidades; 8 velocidades; 9 velocidades; Velocidade única; Outro
sv: Hastighetskompatibilitet för drivlina: 10-växlad; 11-växlad; 12-växlad; 13-växlad; 14-växlad; 2-växlad; 3-växlad; 4-växlad; 5-växlad; 6-växlad; 7-växlad; 8-växlad; 9-växlad; Single speed; Övrigt
ja: ドライブトレインの速度互換性: 10速; 11速; 12速; 13速; 14速; 2速; 3速; 4速; 5速; 6速; 7速; 8速; 9速; シングルスピード; その他
en: Drivetrain speed compatibility: 10-speed; 11-speed; 12-speed; 13-speed; 14-speed; 2-speed; 3-speed; 4-speed; 5-speed; 6-speed; 7-speed; 8-speed; 9-speed; Single-speed; Other
nb: Kompatibilitet med drivverkhastighet: 10-girs; 11-girs; 12-girs; 13-girs; 14-girs; 2-girs; 3-girs; 4-girs; 5-girs; 6-girs; 7-girs; 8-girs; 9-girs; Ettgirs; Annet
hu: Hajtáslánc-sebesség kompatibilitása: 10 sebességes; 11 sebességes; 12 sebességes; 13 sebességes; 14 sebességes; 2 sebességes; 3 sebességes; 4 sebességes; 5 sebességes; 6 sebességes; 7 sebességes; 8 sebességes; 9 sebességes; Egysebességes; Egyéb
ru: Совместимость по количеству скоростей трансмиссии: На 10 скоростей; На 11 скоростей; На 12 скоростей; На 13 скоростей; На 14 скоростей; На 2 скорости; На 3 скорости; На 4 скорости; На 5 скоростей; На 6 скоростей; На 7 скоростей; На 8 скоростей; На 9 скоростей; На 1 скорость; Другое
nl: Aandrijflijn snelheid compatibiliteit: 10-speed; 11-speed; 12-speed; 13-speed; 14-speed; 2-speed; 3-speed; 4-speed; 5-speed; 6-speed; 7-speed; 8-speed; 9-speed; Single-speed; Overige
es: Compatibilidad de velocidad del tren de transmisión: 10 velocidades; 11 velocidades; 12 velocidades; 13 velocidades; 14 velocidades; 2 velocidades; 3 velocidades; 4 velocidades; 5 velocidades; 6 velocidades; 7 velocidades; 8 velocidades; 9 velocidades; Una sola velocidad; Otro
sl-SI: Združljivost hitrosti pogonskega sklopa: 10 prestav; 11 prestav; 12 prestav; 13 prestav; 14 prestav; 2 prestavi; 3 prestave; 4 prestave; 5 prestav; 6 prestav; 7 prestav; 8 prestav; 9 prestav; 1 prestava; Drugo
ko: 구동계 단수 호환성: 10단; 11단; 12단; 13단; 14단; 2단; 3단; 4단; 5단; 6단; 7단; 8단; 9단; 싱글 스피드; 기타
da: Kompatibilitet mellem drivlinjehastigheder: 10-speed; 11-speed; 12-speed; 13-speed; 14-speed; 2-speed; 3-speed; 4-speed; 5-speed; 6-speed; 7-speed; 8-speed; 9-speed; Single-speed; Andet
zh-CN: 传动系统速度适配性: 10 速; 11 速; 12 速; 13 速; 14 速; 2 速; 3 速; 4 速; 5 速; 6 速; 7 速; 8 速; 9 速; 单速; 其他
ro-RO: Compatibilitatea vitezei transmisiei: 10 viteze; 11 viteze; 12 viteze; 13 viteze; 14 viteze; 2 viteze; 3 viteze; 4 viteze; 5 viteze; 6 viteze; 7 viteze; 8 viteze; 9 viteze; O singură viteză; Altele
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost brzina pogonskog sklopa: 10 brzina; 11 brzina; 12 brzina; 13 brzina; 14 brzina; 2 brzine; 3 brzine; 4 brzine; 5 brzina; 6 brzina; 7 brzina; 8 brzina; 9 brzina; Jedna brzina; Ostalo
bg-BG: Съвместимост с брой скорости на задвижването: 10 скорости; 11 скорости; 12 скорости; 13 скорости; 14 скорости; 2 скорости; 3 скорости; 4 скорости; 5 скорости; 6 скорости; 7 скорости; 8 скорости; 9 скорости; Една скорост; Друго
zh-TW: 傳動速別相容性: 10 速; 11 速; 12 速; 13 速; 14 速; 2 速; 3 速; 4 速; 5 速; 6 速; 7 速; 8 速; 9 速; 單速; 其他
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของความเร็วระบบขับเคลื่อน: 10 สปีด; 11 สปีด; 12 สปีด; 13 สปีด; 14 สปีด; 2 สปีด; 3 สปีด; 4 สปีด; 5 สปีด; 6 สปีด; 7 สปีด; 8 สปีด; 9 สปีด; สปีดเดียว; อื่นๆ
it: compatibilità della velocità della trasmissione: A 10 velocità; A 11 velocità; A 12 velocità; A 13 velocità; A 14 velocità; A 2 velocità; A 3 velocità; A 4 velocità; A 5 velocità; A 6 velocità; A 7 velocità; A 8 velocità; A 9 velocità; Velocità singola; Altro
vi: Khả năng tương thích tốc độ hệ thống truyền động: 10 tốc độ; 11 tốc độ; 12 tốc độ; 13 tốc độ; 14 tốc độ; 2 tốc độ; 3 tốc độ; 4 tốc độ; 5 tốc độ; 6 tốc độ; 7 tốc độ; 8 tốc độ; 9 tốc độ; Đơn tốc; Khác
cs: Kompatibilita rychlostí hnacího ústrojí: 10 rychlostí; 11 rychlostí; 12 rychlostí; 13 rychlostí; 14 rychlostí; 2 rychlosti; 3 rychlosti; 4 rychlosti; 5 rychlostí; 6 rychlostí; 7 rychlostí; 8 rychlostí; 9 rychlostí; 1 rychlost; Jiné